District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.06

District of Columbia Taxicab Commission — Organization.

The Commission may organize task-specific panels as its needs dictate. All acts and orders issued by a panel shall be ratified by a majority of the appointed members of the Commission before taking effect.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 7, 33 DCR 703
May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-109, § 2(a), 35 DCR 2181
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 501(b), 43 DCR 4569
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(f), 59 DCR 9431
1981 Ed., § 40-1706.
2001 Ed., § 50-306.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 501(b) of Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-226, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2584).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 501(b) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-302, July 25, 1996, 43 DCR 4181, § 501(b) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-429, October 29, 1996, 43 DCR 6151, and § 501(b) of the Fiscal Year 1997 Budget Support Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-2, February 19, 1997, 44 DCR 1590).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 6-97, § 7a, concerning industry panel review of modernization regulations, see § 3(a) of the Livery Class Regulation and Ride-Sharing Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-169, September 27, 2013, 60 DCR 14736).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-301.

Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.
Designation of District of Columbia Taxicab Commission Panel on Rates and Rules and Panel on Consumer and Industry Concerns: See Mayor’s Order 97-64, April 2, 1997 ( 44 DCR 2176).

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.